Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 5. Application for Permit for Appropriation; Procedure
§ 41-4-506.
Time limits for completing construction work; extensions; forfeiture of rights; cancellation of permit; notice of date of expiration to appropriator.

Whenever the state engineer places his endorsement of approval on any application for a water permit, he shall require that actual construction work be completed within the time set by him in the permit. The time set for completion shall not exceed a period of five (5) years after the date of approval of application. In the case of an application for a ditch permit, he shall further require that the application of the water to beneficial use must be completed before the date which he shall specify, and which shall not be earlier than the date specified for the completion of construction; and that final proof of appropriation must be submitted within five (5) years after the date specified for the completion of the application of the water to beneficial use. He may limit the application to a less period of time for the completion of construction and application of water to beneficial use than is asked for in the application. For good cause shown, the state engineer may at any time, or from time to time, before the date of expiration, extend any or all of these periods. An extension of time for compliance with any of the specified requirements shall be construed to automatically extend for a like period the time for compliance with any of the specific requirements in relation to which the time expires thereafter. Default by the holder of the permit in any of the specified requirements shall work a forfeiture of the water right involved. The state engineer may upon such default cancel the permit. The state engineer shall, at least three (3) months before default in any of these requirements shall be operative, notify the permit holder when the time allowed will expire. Notification may be delivered by United States postal service, by other generally accepted mail delivery method to the post-office address given by the permit holder or by email or other electronic means that provides actual notice to the permit holder. If the permit holder cannot be reached mail or by email the state engineer shall notify the permit holder by certified mail to the permit holder's last known address and shall publish notice of the default on the state engineer's official website and for three (3) weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county, or in case there is no newspaper of general circulation published in the county, then in a newspaper published in the state of Wyoming and in general circulation in the county, the last publication to be at least two (2) months before cancellation of the permit.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 34; 1895, ch. 45, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 922; C.S. 1910, § 732; Laws 1917, ch. 119, § 1; 1919, ch. 18, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 840; Laws 1921, ch. 23, § 1; 1923, ch. 7, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-409; Laws 1937, ch. 80, § 1; 1941, ch. 21, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-243; W.S. 1957, § 41-206; Laws 1973, ch. 131, § 1; 1995, ch. 102, § 1; 2021 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to final proof of appropriation and as to procedures generally, see §

41-4-511

.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the eighth sentence, deleted "by registered mail, with a return receipt requested" preceding "at least three" and ", at the post-office address given by him" following "permit holder," added the ninth sentence, in the last sentence, substituted "mail or by email" for "registered mail, or if the address of the permit holder is unknown," and added "notify the permit holder by certified mail to the permit holder's last known address and shall" and "on the state engineer's official website and."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Granting of extension of time under this section does not violate eminent domain provisions

of the Wyoming constitution. Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Only substantive issue to be decided

in questions arising out of an application for an extension of time under this section is whether or not good cause for the extension has been shown by the applicant: that means, has the applicant shown the state engineer good cause why he could not start and complete the reservoir within the original permit period or an extension thereof? Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

The sole criterion for extending the time periods called for in this section is whether the permittee has shown good cause for the extension. Associated Enters. v. Toltec Watershed Improvement Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978).

Genesis for issue eligible for consideration under this section is diligence.

Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Diligence defined. —

The diligence required in the prosecution of the construction of all works necessary for the diversion and application of water in an attempted appropriation of the same is that constancy or steadfastness of purpose or labor which is usual with men engaged in like enterprises, and who desire a speedy accomplishment of their designs. Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Determination of diligence is factual in nature and is to be determined from the circumstances surrounding each particular case. Associated Enters. v. Toltec Watershed Improvement Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978).

Where litigation has unavoidably delayed construction and completion of reservoir,

the facts are, within the discretion of the state engineer, sufficient to constitute good cause for granting permittee an extension of time. Associated Enters. v. Toltec Watershed Improvement Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978); Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Right of entry obtained by grant or condemnation. —

An extension of time within which to construct a reservoir does not carry with it a right of entry, as the right of entry, the easement, must be obtained by grant or condemnation. Associated Enters. v. Toltec Watershed Improvement Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978).

Matters not considered in application for extension. —

Such matters as the effect of the construction of a reservoir upon existing water rights is outside the ken of an application for an extension of time under this section. Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Claimed water rights not relitigated. —

Holders of vested senior water rights cannot, in a proceeding contemplated by this section, litigate claimed rights conceived by the original reservoir permit approval-or-rejection statute (§

41-4-503

). Associated Enters. v. Toltec Watershed Improvement Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978).

Abandonment. —

In order that an initiated inchoate water right may be held to be abandoned, such intention must be shown. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Laches. —

Where suits to quiet title to water rights in Little Laramie River were started in 1932 attacking appropriation claimed by defendant under an adjudication by board of control in 1903, the attack was at least on largest part of defendant's appropriation barred by laches. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Speculative profit. —

If state engineer and board of control do their duty, as the court presumes they do, as to maps of lands to be irrigated and time within which appropriation must be completed, no one should be able to secure any part of it for speculative profit. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

Applied

in

Snake River Land Co. v. State Bd. of Control, 560 P.2d 733,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1977); Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983); In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 2002 WY 89,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 93

, 48 P.3d 1040 (Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912); Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1925); John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For comment, “The Idaho and Montana Procedures for Obtaining Water Use Permits — Possible Sources for Improvement of Wyoming Law,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1975).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

§ 41-4-507.
Maps and plats; when required with application; contents; format requirements; copies; duties of state engineer generally.

Each application for a permit to appropriate waters for beneficial uses under a project embracing the major irrigable portion of an entire drainage basin within the limits of this state which has been approved by either state or federal agencies for development and construction in subdivisions as the result of preliminary investigations must be accompanied by a map or plat made by or under the responsible charge of a professional engineer or professional land surveyor and be signed by and bear the seal of the professional engineer or professional land surveyor. The map or plat shall be on a scale to conform to the regulations of the state engineer, showing the approximate location of all streams, proposed reservoirs, main canals and the other data required under the terms of W.S.

41-3-301

, together with the approximate location and area of the lands to be irrigated and approximate capacity of each of the reservoirs to be constructed. It shall be the duty of the state engineer to approve any such application made in conformity herewith which contemplates the application of the water of a drainage basin to the beneficial use of a major irrigable portion thereof where the proposed use does not tend to impair the value of existing rights, or to be otherwise detrimental to the public welfare; provided, however, that any permit for appropriation of waters for beneficial uses upon the irrigable lands designated in such a drainage basin project application, must be conditioned for the submission to the state engineer of detailed maps, plans and specifications applicable to a single subdivision of the project and the approval thereof by the state engineer, prior to the commencement of the construction of any such subdivisions; provided further that such subdivision maps, plans and specifications shall conform to the requirements hereinafter set forth as applicable to other applications not embracing the major irrigable portion of an entire drainage basin.

Except for applications made pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) of this section, every other application for a permit to appropriate water for beneficial uses must be accompanied by a map or plat, showing accurately the location and extent of the proposed work. The maps or plats must be on a scale to conform to the regulations of the state engineer and be made by or under the responsible charge of a professional engineer or professional land surveyor and be signed by and bear the seal of the professional engineer or professional land surveyor; they must show the location of the headgate or point of diversion by courses and distances from some government corner; they must show the actual location of the ditch or canal, or water line of the reservoir, and must show, wherever section lines are crossed, the distance to the nearest government corner. The map or plat must show the course of the river, stream or other source of supply; the location and area of all lands proposed to be reclaimed; the position and area of all reservoirs or basins intended to be created for the purpose of storing water; the location of the intersection with all other ditches, canals, laterals or reservoirs which are caused by this work, or with which connections are made. These maps must contain the name of the proposed work, and, where possible, the number of the permit. They must in addition, have the name or names of the applicant or applicants and the certificate of the engineer or surveyor, giving the date of survey, his name and address.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an application and accompanying maps, plans, plats and designs filed in the state engineer’s office shall comply with the requirements of W.S. 33-29-801(a)(ii) through (iv) and subsections (d) and (e) of this section when the application is to:

Construct small reservoirs for stock or other beneficial uses where the capacity of the reservoir does not exceed twenty (20) acre feet or twenty (20) feet in dam height;

Develop springs for any beneficial use up to twenty-five (25) gallons per minute; or

Construct flood water detention dams storing fifty (50) acre feet or less and not to exceed twenty (20) feet in height provided the dam has a minimum outlet of eighteen (18) inches diameter and the dead storage does not exceed twenty (20) acre feet.

An application made pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be signed by the applicant or an agent acting for him and shall be accompanied, at a minimum, by aerial photographs, digital imagery or United States geological survey quadrangle maps, of a scale provided by Wyoming board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors rule, with designation of the township, range, section and section corner or quarter corner and the location of the installation designated in the quarter section on the photographs or United States geological survey quadrangle maps and a description of:

The dam including height, width, depth, construction materials, depth to be submerged and height of the free board; and

The reservoir including length, width, average depth, submerged area and capacity.

Aerial photographs, digital imagery or United States geological survey quadrangle maps accompanying an application made pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall comply with the following requirements:

Two (2) aerial photographs, digital images or United States geological survey quadrangle maps shall accompany each application;

The scale on the aerial photographs, digital imagery or United States geological survey quadrangle maps shall not be less than two (2) inches to the mile;

An identified section corner or quarter corner shall be shown on each aerial photograph, digital image or United States geological survey quadrangle map;

The entire section in which the facility is located shall be shown on each aerial photograph, digital image or United States geological survey quadrangle map along with subdivision lines showing forty (40) acre tracts; and

The location of the facility shall be shown within the proper forty (40) acre subdivision.

The state engineer may adopt rules and regulations which provide exceptions to the filing requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section for projects for which, because of the size, nature or location, an exception would not impede upon public safety or the integrity of a water right. The exceptions provided pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to the exceptions provided in subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 35; 1895, ch. 45, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 924; C.S. 1910, § 734; C.S. 1920, § 842; R.S. 1931, § 122-411; Laws 1939, ch. 68, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-245; W.S. 1957, § 41-207; Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 2; 2017 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “in duplicate, the original of which shall be on tracing linen” following “a map or plat” in the first sentence; and in (b), deleted “in duplicate” following “map or plat”, “the original of these” preceding “maps or plats” and “on tracing linen” following “must be drawn.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), inserted “made by or under the responsible charge of a professional engineer or professional land surveyor and be signed by and bear the seal of the professional engineer or professional land surveyor. The map or plat shall be” and made a related and stylistic change; in (b), inserted “Except for applications made pursuant to subsection (a) or (c) of this section” at the beginning, inserted “and be made by or under the responsible charge of a professional engineer or professional land surveyor and be signed by and bear the seal of the professional engineer or professional land surveyor”, and made a related and stylistic change; and added (c) through (f).

This section is not to be construed too rigidly

in connection with maps and plans. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

The requirement of this section relating to the filing of maps and plats is for administrative purposes

on the part of public officials and in special cases to protect the public. The supreme court considered that plaintiff, in the case before it, had no right to raise objections in that connection unless it had a special interest therein and was harmed or injured. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

This section does not prohibit amendments and changes in the map,

in the plans, and in the irrigation works, during construction, at least where the changes are not unreasonable and are made with the approval of the state engineer and prior to the time that another party initiates an appropriation from the same source. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

Purpose of filings. —

Act of 1886 which provided for filing of statements by ditch owners or claimants was for purpose of establishing record of claims of water users to protect them in their rights, assist in adjudicating priorities and in regulation for use of the water. Nichols v. Hufford, 21 Wyo. 477, 133 P. 1084,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1913).

Prior appropriation. —

Right to use of water for beneficial purposes depends upon prior appropriation and it existed before there was any legislation upon the subject. Moyer v. Preston, 6 Wyo. 308, 44 P. 845,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1896).

Speculative profit. —

If state engineer and board of control do their duty, as the court presumes they do, as to maps of lands to be irrigated and time within which appropriation must be completed, no one should be able to secure any part of it for speculative profit. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

Waste or seepage water. —

The words “waste and seepage water” written on a map accompanying application for permit to appropriate water are equivalent to direct statement that applicant wanted to appropriate waste waters and not water from a natural stream. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Applied

in

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Johnston v. Little Horse Creek Irrigating Co., 13 Wyo. 208, 79 P. 22,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 39

, 70 L.R.A. 341 (1904); Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912); Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1925).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

§ 41-4-508.
Maps and plats; examination; approval; filing; return of copy.

It shall be the duty of the state engineer to examine these maps or plats and to ascertain if they agree with the description contained in the application, and when found to agree, or made to agree, to approve the same, file one (1) copy in his office and return the other, approved, to the party filing them. These maps or plats may be received and maintained by the state engineer in an electronic format.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 35; 1895, ch. 45, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 925; C.S. 1910, § 735; C.S. 1920, § 843; R.S. 1931, § 122-412; C.S. 1945, § 71-246; W.S. 1957, § 41-208; Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted the final sentence.

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912).

§ 41-4-509.
Maps and plats; additional information; longitudinal profiles of ditches.

In case of ditches or canals carrying more than fifty (50) cubic feet of water per second, the engineer may require, in addition to the maps or plats above described, the following: a longitudinal profile of the ditch showing the bottom and proposed water line; the horizontal scale of this line shall not be less than one (1) inch to one thousand (1,000) feet, and the vertical scale not less than one (1) inch to twenty (20) feet. If submitted electronically, the file shall be capable of reproduction at these scales.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 35; 1895, ch. 45, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 926; C.S. 1910, § 736; C.S. 1920, § 844; R.S. 1931, § 122-413; C.S. 1945, § 71-247; W.S. 1957, § 41-209; Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted the final sentence.

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912).

§ 41-4-510.
Maps and plats; additional information; cross section plans; plans of obstructions; reservoir specifications; field notes.

The engineer may require, in addition to the maps and plats above described, a plan showing cross sections at a sufficient number of points to show the different forms which the ditch, when completed, will take, and showing what proportion of the water is to be conveyed in excavation and what proportion to be conveyed in fill. These plans shall be drawn, or be capable of being drawn and printed if submitted electronically, on a horizontal and vertical scale of one (1) inch to twenty (20) feet. Plans of any dams, cribs, embankments or other proposed work to obstruct any river, stream, lake or pond, or other source of water supply, shall be drawn on a longitudinal scale of not less than one (1) inch to two hundred (200) feet, and for cross sections on a scale of not less than one (1) inch to twenty (20) feet; and shall show what material is intended to be used and placed in such work. Timber, brush, stone or other material except earth used in such works shall be shown in detail on a plan, the scale of which shall not be less than one (1) inch to four (4) feet. The maps of all proposed reservoirs shall show the surface of the ground under water, and a sufficient number of lines of level shall be shown so that the contents of the reservoir or basin may be approximately determined. If the levels shall be shown by contour lines they shall be on a scale sufficiently large to show vertical levels not exceeding five (5) feet, and with all such reservoir plans there shall be furnished a plan, on a scale of not less than one (1) inch to four (4) feet, showing the method of providing a wasteway for such reservoir, and method of drawing off the water from such reservoir or basin. If the state engineer deems it necessary he may require the submission of complete plans and specifications for his approval. He may also require the filing of field notes of canal and reservoir surveys.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 35; 1895, ch. 45, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 927; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 14; C.S. 1910, § 737; C.S. 1920, § 845; R.S. 1931, § 122-414; C.S. 1945, § 71-248; W.S. 1957, § 41-210; Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to application of this section to maps and plans filed with application for permit to construct reservoir, see §

41-3-301

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “or be capable of being drawn and submitted electronically” in the second sentence.

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912).

§ 41-4-511.
Final proof of appropriation; procedures generally.

Whenever an appropriation of water has been perfected in accordance with any permit issued by the state engineer, the appropriator may submit final proof of appropriation of water at any time within the time specified by W.S.

41-4-506

, to the superintendent of the water division in which the water right involved is situated, or, when more expedient, before the superintendent of another water division or the state engineer, or before a water commissioner in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

41-4-308

. Proof shall be made by appropriators under oath upon forms furnished by the state board of control. The superintendent shall collect for each proof taken a fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), which fee shall be transmitted to the secretary of the board of control together with the several proofs taken. The secretary of the board of control shall use the fee to pay the appropriate amount for the county recording fee for the recording of the certificate of appropriation in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the water right is situated and the newspaper advertising fee for advertising the several proofs as provided in this section. The remainder of the fee shall be remitted to the state treasurer to the credit of the general fund. If the board of control rejects any proof, the fee shall be returned to the person, association or corporation submitting such proof. At least thirty (30) days prior to any regular meeting of the state board of control the superintendent of each water division shall cause all proofs taken by him to be advertised in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper having general circulation in the community where the water right involved is situated, such advertisement to contain in each case the permit number, the date of priority, the name of the ditch, canal or reservoir, the name of the appropriator, the name of the stream from which the appropriation is made, and the amount of the appropriation expressed in acres for ditches designed for the irrigation of lands and in acre-feet for reservoirs, or in cubic feet per second or gallons per minute when the appropriation is for domestic, stock, municipal, industrial, manufacturing, fish hatchery or power purposes. Advertisements shall state the time when, and the place where, the proofs of appropriation of water taken by the superintendent will be open for public inspection for a period of not less than one (1) or more than five (5) days, and the last day of the period shall not be less than fifteen (15) days prior to the meeting of the board. Any party claiming an interest in any water right from the stream or streams to which the advertised proofs refer, shall have the right to contest the proposed adjudications according to the provisions of W.S.

41-4-312

through

41-4-315

. Upon the completion of the taking of proofs of appropriation and the advertising, the superintendent of each water division shall transmit to the office of the state board of control in Cheyenne the several proofs taken, together with fees collected, and shall accompany the same with affidavits of publication as evidence of the required advertisement. At its next regular meeting the board shall consider all proofs of appropriation received from the division superintendents and if satisfied that there are no conflicts and that any appropriation involved has been perfected in accordance with the permit issued by the state engineer, the state board of control by the hand of its president, attested under seal, shall issue a certificate of appropriation of water as described in W.S.

41-4-325

and send the certificate to the county clerk of the county in which the use of water has been made to be recorded by the clerk as provided in W.S.

41-4-325

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 36; R.S. 1899, § 928; C.S. 1910, § 738; C.S. 1920, § 849; Laws 1925, ch. 118, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-418; Laws 1937, ch. 72, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-249; W.S. 1957, § 41-211; Laws 1965, ch. 180, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1993, ch. 123, § 1; 1999, ch. 34, § 1; 2017 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to issuance of certificate of appropriation by board of control with reference to underground water in accordance with the provisions of this section, see §

41-3-935

.

As to adjudication of water rights with reference to diversion or storage of water for use in adjoining state upon proof of beneficial use as provided in this section, see §

41-4-104

.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” in the second sentence; in the third sentence substituted “secretary of the board of control shall use the fee to pay the appropriate amount for the county recording fee” for “appropriate amount for the county recording fee shall be used by the secretary of the board to pay” and added “newspaper advertising fee for advertising the several proofs as provided in this section”; deleted “recording” preceding “fee” in the fourth sentence; and deleted “The advertisement shall be paid for by the county as provided by
W.S.

41-4-307

” following “meeting of the board” near the middle of the paragraph.

“Adjudication”

of stream priorities is a proceeding in rem, or quasi in rem; and adjudication is generally considered equivalent of “determination.” Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Relevancy of determination. —

In action to quiet title, claimed by prescription, to water right in Little Laramie river watershed, and to which defendants set up decrees in that and Big Laramie rivers, the determination or adjudication in connection with Little Laramie was relevant to show plaintiff's claim is unfounded, and determination in Big Laramie was relevant to show defendants' interest in controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Speculation is issue

during an application proceeding, pursuant to §

41-4-503

, and during the final stages leading to a certificate of appropriation, pursuant to this section, and it may also be an issue during an abandonment proceeding, pursuant to §

41-3-401

.Denius v. T R Twelve, Inc., 589 P.2d 374,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1979).

Speculative profit. —

If state engineer and board of control do their duty, as court presumes that they do, as to maps of lands to be irrigated and time within which appropriation must be completed, no one should be able to secure any part of it for speculative profit. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

Necessary parties on appeal. —

Where appeal from board of control to district court taken by several parties jointly was dismissed and on appeal to supreme court from such order of dismissal, one of appellants was not joined as a party, in absence of any showing therefor, such failure was fatal to proceedings in error. Johnston v. Little Horse Creek Irrigating Co., 4 Wyo. 164, 33 P. 22,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1893).

Applied

in

Snake River Land Co. v. State Bd. of Control, 560 P.2d 733,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1977); Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

Wyoming v. United States, 933 F. Supp. 1030, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11526 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Nebraska v. Wyoming, 325 U.S. 589, 65 S. Ct. 1332, 66 S. Ct. 1, 89 L. Ed. 1815, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 2620 (1945).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

For comment, “Procedural Consideration in the Judicial Determination of Water Disputes,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1974).

For comment, “The Idaho and Montana Procedures for Obtaining Water Use Permits — Possible Sources for Improvement of Wyoming Law,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1975).

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

§ 41-4-512.
Final proof of appropriation; date of priority.

The priority of such appropriation shall date from the filing of the application in the engineer’s office.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 37; R.S. 1899, § 929; C.S. 1910, § 739; C.S. 1920, § 850; R.S. 1931, § 122-419; C.S. 1945, § 71-250; W.S. 1957, § 41-212.

A junior appropriator of water may not take advantage of an irregularity under §

41-4-507

to subvert the fundamental rule of priority of appropriation which, under this section, dates from the time of filing of application for a permit in the state engineer's office, where such an irregularity is only the concern of the public and has not harmed the junior appropriator. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

Applied

in

Snake River Land Co. v. State Bd. of Control, 560 P.2d 733,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1977); Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Nebraska v. Wyoming, 325 U.S. 589, 65 S. Ct. 1332, 66 S. Ct. 1, 89 L. Ed. 1815, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 2620 (1945); Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1903).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For comment, “The Idaho and Montana Procedures for Obtaining Water Use Permits — Possible Sources for Improvement of Wyoming Law,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1975).

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

§ 41-4-513.
Adjudication of underground water rights.

After issuance of a permit, or recording of a statement of claim, or registration of a well, under the procedures provided for by law, and completion of the work according to the terms of the permit, as certified to by the state engineer or his authorized representative following an inspection of the work, and the recording of such information as is deemed necessary concerning the works, and an inspection of the lands irrigated or of the other uses being made of the water, the board of control may adjudicate such underground water rights upon proof of beneficial use being submitted as provided for by W.S.

41-4-511

. The appropriator shall pay the necessary fees as provided by W.S.

41-4-511

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 183, § 1; 1973, ch. 161, § 1; 1999, ch. 34, § 1; 2017 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “The appropriator shall pay the necessary fees as provided by W.S.

41-4-511

” for “The costs of advertising groundwater proofs shall be paid by the county as provided by W.S.

41-4-307

.”